Alabama, session 2026rs, HB130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The governing body of the St. Clair
County Day Program, Incorporated, by resolution legally
adopted to conform to the rules prescribed by the Board of
Control of the Teachers' Retirement System, may elect to have
its executive officers and full-time employees, from whatever
source and in whatever manner paid, become eligible to
participate in the Teachers' Retirement System of Alabama,
subject to all rules, regulations, and conditions thereof.
(b) After the governing body of the St. Clair County
Page 1

(b) After the governing body of the St. Clair County
HB130 INTRODUCED
Day Program, Incorporated, has made an election through a
resolution as provided in subsection (a), its employees and
executive officers may participate in and be entitled to all
benefits of the Teachers' Retirement System of Alabama;
provided, that where contributions are made from salaries paid
by the St. Clair County Day Program, Incorporated, the St.
Clair County Day Program, Incorporated, shall pay the employer
cost, calculated as a percentage of the salaries of those
employees, to be contributed as employer contributions in
accordance with Section 16-25-21, Code of Alabama 1975. The
amount shall be paid monthly and at the same time as the
members' contributions are made to the Teachers' Retirement
System.
(c) The governing body of the St. Clair County Day
Program, Incorporated, may provide in its resolution to the
Teachers' Retirement System's Board of Control that all
service rendered by an eligible employee or executive officer
to the program, before the effective date of the program's
election to come under the Teachers' Retirement System, shall
be creditable service to the employee or executive officer;
provided, that any provision shall apply only to those
employees and officers who were in the active service of the
program on the effective date of the program's election to be
covered under the Teachers' Retirement System; and provided
further, that the resolution also states that the St. Clair
County Day Program, Incorporated, shall assume and pay, as
required, all costs necessary to fund the crediting of the
previous service, the costs to be determined by the actuary
Page 2

previous service, the costs to be determined by the actuary
HB130 INTRODUCED
employed by the Teachers' Retirement System Board of Control.
All benefits that accrue and are payable to any beneficiary
hereunder shall be limited to, and shall not exceed, the
amount paid in by the beneficiary and the employer plus his or
her portion of the interest earned and the enhancement of his
or her monies by investing them, less cost of administration,
at no cost to the State of Alabama.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 3